Utah statutes.
59-2-905.   Legislature to set minimum rate of levy for state's contribution
to minimum school program -- Matters to be considered -- Commission to
transmit rate to auditors -- Acknowledgment of receipt.
The Legislature shall set the minimum rate of levy on each dollar of taxable
value of  taxable property so that it will raise sufficient supplementary
revenue to pay the state's contribution to the cost of the minimum school
program for that year.  The Legislature shall take into consideration the
estimated tax delinquency for the current year, and shall be conservative in
its estimate of revenue to assure ample funds for the state's contribution to
the cost of the minimum school program.  The commission shall immediately
transmit to the county auditor of each county and to the state auditor a
statement of the rate.  The county auditor shall, upon receipt, give the
commission written acknowledgment of receipt.
